Utah statutes.
20A-5-603.   Vacancies -- Removal of poll workers.

(1) (a)  If a poll worker or alternate is unable to serve, that poll worker or alternate shall immediately notify the election officer, who shall fill the vacancy as provided in this section.

(b)  The election officer may fill a vacancy occurring under this section by appointing the alternate to serve or, if that is impossible, by appointing some other qualified person to fill the vacancy.

(2)  The election officer shall summarily remove any poll worker who:

(a)  neglects his duty;

(b)  commits or encourages fraud in connection with any election;

(c)  violates any election law;

(d)  knowingly permits any person to violate any election law;

(e)  has been convicted of a felony;

(f)  commits any act that interferes or tends to interfere with a fair and honest election; or

(g)  is incapable of performing the duties of a poll worker.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2007 General Session

